Wyoming, session 2026, SF0066.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 23-1-705(j) and (k) is amended to
read:
23-1-705. Complimentary licenses; pioneer licenses;
antelope hunt licenses; gunpowder and buckskin hunt
licenses; gratuitous licenses; donated licenses.
(j) In addition the commission may issue upon payment
of proper fees any number, set by rule and regulation, of
antelope licenses, deer licenses, elk licenses and turkey
licenses each year for the exclusive use by persons twenty
(20) years of age or younger with life threatening
illnesses who are sponsored by a nonprofit charitable
organization with a mission to provide opportunities and
experiences to persons with life threatening or serious
illnesses. As a condition of issuing the license, the
sponsoring organization shall pay the appropriate license
fee on behalf of the licensee and at no cost to the
licensee.
(k) The holder of any valid big game animal license,
trophy game animal license, any wild bison license or a
female or calf wild bison license may surrender said
license to the department for reissuance to a veteran with
disabilities, or a person with a permanent disability who
uses a wheelchair, a person with a life‑threatening illness
or a person who is vision impaired as established by
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0066
ENROLLED ACT NO. 57, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
commission rule and regulation selected and sponsored by a
nonprofit charitable organization providing hunting
opportunities. to a veteran with disabilities or a person
with a permanent disability who uses a wheelchair. Any
license reissued in accordance with the provisions of this
subsection shall be for the same species, area and license
type as the license donated. The license shall be reissued
by the department to a qualifying person at no fee. Any
license donated and reissued under the provisions of this
subsection shall not be sold, traded, auctioned or offered
for any monetary value and shall not be issued to, or used
by, any person other than a qualifying person under the
provision of this section and in compliance with commission
rule and regulation. Licenses reissued to persons pursuant
to this subsection shall not be subject to residency,
drawing or fee requirements under W.S. 23-2-101 or
23-2-107. The five (5) year restriction imposed on the
receipt of a cow or calf moose or a ewe or lamb bighorn
sheep license by W.S. 23-1-703(b), the lifetime restriction
imposed on the receipt of a grizzly bear, mountain goat,
ram or any bighorn sheep, any wild bison or any moose or
antlered moose license by W.S. 23-1-703(c) or the
restrictions imposed on a wild bison under W.S. 23-2-107(f)
shall not be applicable in any manner to a license issued
pursuant to this subsection.
Section 2. The game and fish commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0066
ENROLLED ACT NO. 57, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3